Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.455

Members' retirement contributions—Pick up by employer—Conditions.

The following two conditions apply to the employer pick up of member contributions authorized under RCW 41.04.445 (section 2, chapter 227, Laws of 1984):

(1) The retirement contributions, although designated as member contributions, will be picked up by the employer, as provided in RCW 41.04.445 (section 2, chapter 227, Laws of 1984) in lieu of contributions by the member.

(2) No retirement system member will have the option of choosing to receive the contributed amounts directly instead of having them paid by the employer to the retirement system.

[ 1985 c 13 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Application—Retrospective application—1985 c 13: See notes following RCW 41.04.445.